Nebraska, session 109, LB93.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB93 LB93
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-1912, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1912 (1) When a defendant is charged with a felony or when a
defendant is charged with a misdemeanor or a violation of a city or
village ordinance for which imprisonment is a possible penalty, he or she
may request the court where the case is to be tried, at any time after
the filing of the indictment, information, or complaint, to order the
prosecuting attorney to permit the defendant to inspect and copy or
photograph:
(a) The defendant's statement, if any. For purposes of this
subdivision, statement includes any of the following which relate to the
investigation of the underlying charge or charges in the case and which
were developed or received by law enforcement agencies:
(i) Written or recorded statements;
(ii) Written summaries of oral statements; and
(iii) The substance of oral statements;
(b) The defendant's prior criminal record, if any;
(c) The defendant's recorded testimony before a grand jury;
(d) The names and addresses of witnesses on whose evidence the
charge is based;
(e) The results and reports, in any form, of physical or mental
examinations, and of scientific tests, or experiments made in connection
with the particular case, or copies thereof;
(f) Documents, papers, books, accounts, letters, photographs,
objects, or other tangible things of whatsoever kind or nature which
could be used as evidence by the prosecuting authority; and
(g) Reports developed or received by law enforcement agencies when
such reports directly relate to the investigation of the underlying
charge or charges in the case; and .
(h) The name of any expert witness who may be called by the
prosecuting authority, the witness's qualifications, and a complete
-2-

LB93 LB93
2025 2025
statement of any opinions the witness may offer, including the basis and
reasons for such opinions.
(2) The court may issue such an order pursuant to the provisions of
this section. In the exercise of its judicial discretion, the court shall
consider, among other things, whether:
(a) The request is material to the preparation of the defense;
(b) The request is not made primarily for the purpose of harassing
the prosecution or its witnesses;
(c) The request, if granted, would not unreasonably delay the trial
of the offense and an earlier request by the defendant could not have
reasonably been made;
(d) There is no substantial likelihood that the request, if granted,
would preclude a just determination of the issues at the trial of the
offense; or
(e) The request, if granted, would not result in the possibility of
bodily harm to, or coercion of, witnesses.
(3) Whenever the court refuses to grant an order pursuant to the
provisions of this section, it shall render its findings in writing
together with the facts upon which the findings are based.
(4) Whenever the prosecuting attorney believes that the granting of
an order under the provisions of this section will result in the
possibility of bodily harm to witnesses or that witnesses will be
coerced, the court may permit him or her to make such a showing in the
form of a written statement to be inspected by the court alone. The
statement shall be sealed and preserved in the records of the court to be
made available to the appellate court in the event of an appeal by the
defendant.
(5) This section is subject to the continuing duty of disclosure
under section 29-1918.
(6) (5) This section does not apply to jailhouse informants as
defined in section 29-4701. Sections 29-4701 to 29-4706 govern jailhouse
-3-

LB93 LB93
2025 2025
informants.
Sec. 2. Section 29-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-1913 (1) When in any felony prosecution or any prosecution for a
misdemeanor or a violation of a city or village ordinance for which
imprisonment is a possible penalty, the evidence of the prosecuting
authority consists of scientific tests or analyses of ballistics,
firearms identification, fingerprints, blood, semen, or other stains,
upon motion of the defendant the court where the case is to be tried may
order the prosecuting attorney to make available to the defense such
evidence necessary to allow the defense to conduct like tests or analyses
with its own experts.
(2) When in any felony prosecution or any prosecution for a
misdemeanor or a violation of a city or village ordinance for which
imprisonment is a possible penalty, the evidence of the prosecuting
authority consists of an electronic communication device, computer, or
digital information, or scientific tests or analyses of such device,
computer, or information, the court where the case is to be tried may
order the prosecuting attorney to make available to the defendant such
evidence necessary to present a defense or allow the defendant to conduct
like tests or analyses with the defendant's own experts.
(3) An The order under this section shall specify the time, place,
and manner of making such tests or analyses by the defense.
(4) An Such an order under this section shall not be entered if the
tests or analyses by the defense cannot be made because of the natural
deterioration of the evidence.
(5) (2) If the evidence necessary to conduct the tests or analyses
by the defense is unavailable because of the neglect or intentional
alteration by representatives of the prosecuting authority, other than
alterations necessary to conduct the initial tests, the tests or analyses
by the prosecuting authority shall not be admitted into evidence.
-4-

LB93 LB93
2025 2025
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Computer has the same meaning as in section 28-1343;
(b) Digital information means information contained on an electronic
communication device or a computer and includes, but is not limited to,
historical, archival, back-up, or legacy files, whether in any current or
historical media format; screenshots; text messages; social media
communications or interactions; or any other digital evidence; and
(c) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in
section 28-833.
Sec. 3. Section 29-1918, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1918 A party who discovers additional evidence or material before
or during trial must promptly disclose its existence to the other party
or the court if:
(1) The evidence or material is subject to discovery or inspection
under sections 29-1912 to 29-1921; and
(2) The other party previously requested, or the court ordered, the
production of such evidence or material. If, subsequent to compliance
with an order for discovery under the provisions of sections 29-1912 to
29-1921, and prior to or during trial, a party discovers additional
material which the party would have been under a duty to disclose or
produce at the time of such previous compliance, the party shall promptly
notify the other party or the other party's attorney and the court of the
existence of the additional material. Such notice shall be given at the
time of the discovery of such additional material.
Sec. 4. Original section 29-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 29-1912 and 29-1918, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-